Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 61

Statutes of Limitations

Effective Dates.

Acts 1857, p. 80, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1875, No. 85, § 25: effective on passage.

Acts 1919, No. 100, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1945, No. 82, § 4: approved Feb. 21, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby ascertained and declared by the 55th General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that as the law now stands many improvement districts are in danger of losing a large amount of revenue which is justly due them from lands heretofore forfeited to such districts for nonpayment of taxes, and that in many instances such loss of revenue will cause such districts to default in the payment of their bond and interest requirements; and that to permit a person holding under a tax title from the State to avoid payment of improvement district taxes upon lands purchased from the State by him would result in an unequal distribution of taxation and thus throw more burden of taxation upon those taxpayers who have been paying their taxes; that it is not feasible for improvement districts to keep informed, as to the sale to the State and subsequent possession under a deed from the State, as to all of the lands within the boundaries of said district, and that an emergency, therefore, exists, and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

18-61-101. Actions to recover land, tenements, or hereditaments.

(a)(1)

No person or his or her heirs shall have, sue, or maintain any action or suit, either in law or equity, for any lands, tenements, or hereditaments after seven (7) years once his or her right to commence, have, or maintain the suit shall have come, fallen, or accrued.

(2)

All suits, either in law or equity, for the recovery of any lands, tenements, or hereditaments shall be had and sued within seven (7) years next after the title or cause of action accrued and no time after the seven (7) years shall have passed.

(b)

If any person who is, or shall be, entitled to commence and prosecute a suit or action in law or equity is, or shall be, at the time the right or title first accrued come or fallen within the age of twenty-one (21) or non compos mentis, the person or his or her heirs, shall and may, notwithstanding the seven (7) years may have expired, bring his or her suit or action if the infant or non compos mentis, or his or her heirs, shall bring it within three (3) years next after full age or coming of sound mind.

(c)

No cumulative disability shall prevent the bar formed and constituted by the saving of this section.

(d)

This section shall not apply to lands which have been sold to any improvement district of any kind or character for taxes due the districts, nor to any taxes due any improvement districts, but the lien of these taxes shall continue until paid.

(e)(1)

Subsections (a)-(c) of this section do not apply to the circumstances set forth in subdivisions (e)(2) and (3) of this section.

(2)

The public's right to use an unpaved road established by an easement is abandoned if:

(A)

Access is denied by a gate across the road; and

(B)

The gate is closed and locked continuously, other than briefly to allow access by the owner or others with the owner's express permission, for one (1) year.

(3)

An action to assert the public's right to use an unpaved road established by an easement is barred after the easement is abandoned under subdivision (e)(2) of this section.

(4)

This subsection does not apply to:

(A)

A road or highway maintained by the State of Arkansas;

(B)

A road maintained or accepted for perpetual maintenance by a county;

(C)

A road maintained by an improvement district;

(D)

A road within the jurisdictional limits of a city of the first class or city of the second class; or

(E)

The claim or right of any person, his or her heirs, successors, assigns, or tenants who use the unpaved road as a means of ingress and egress to lands owned or leased by that person, his or her heirs, successors, assigns, or tenants.

History.

Acts 1851, § 2, p. 145; 1919, No. 100, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 6942; Pope's Dig., § 8918; Acts 1945, No. 82, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-101; Acts 2015, No. 1006, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Subsection (b) of this section may be affected by §9-25-101, which provides that the age of majority is eighteen (18) years.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added (e).

Cross References.

Color of title, payment of tax on wild and unimproved land, §18-11-103.

18-61-102. Entry upon land or tenements — Exception for unpaved road easements.

(a)

An entry upon lands or tenements shall not be deemed sufficient or valid as a claim unless an action is commenced thereon within one (1) year after the entry and within seven (7) years from the time when the right to make the entry descended or accrued.

(b)

This section does not apply to the circumstances set forth in §18-61-101(e)(2) and (3).

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 91, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 6944; Pope's Dig., § 8922; Acts 1945, No. 82, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-104; Acts 2015, No. 1006, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 1006, § 2 added subsection “(b) This section does not apply to the circumstances set forth in §18-61-101(e)(2) and (3)” without proper markup.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment added “Exception for unpaved road easements” in the section heading; designated the existing language as (a); substituted “An entry … shall not” for “No entry upon lands or tenements shall be” in (a); and added (b).

18-61-103. Ejectment.

No action of ejectment, when the plaintiff does not claim title to the lands, shall be brought or maintained when the plaintiff, or his or her testator or intestate, has been five (5) years out of possession.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 53, § 20; C. & M. Dig., § 6948; Pope's Dig., § 8926; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-106.

Cross References.

Ejectment and trespass, §18-60-201 et seq.

18-61-104. Forcible entry and detainer — Unlawful detainer.

Three (3) years' peaceable and uninterrupted possession of the premises immediately preceding the filing of a complaint for forcible entry and detainer or unlawful detainer may be pleaded by any defendant in bar of the plaintiff's demand for possession.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 85, § 20, p. 196; C. & M. Dig., § 4858; Pope's Dig., § 6055; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-107.

Cross References.

Forcible entry and detainer; unlawful detainer, §18-60-301 et seq.

18-61-105. Recovery of lands sold at judicial sales generally.

All actions against the purchaser or his or her heirs or assigns for the recovery of lands sold at judicial sales shall be brought within five (5) years after the date of the sale and not thereafter, except for minors, persons of unsound mind, and persons imprisoned overseas, the period shall be three (3) years after this disability shall have been removed.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 91, § 35; C. & M. Dig., § 6946; Pope's Dig., § 8924; A.S.A. 1947, § 37-108.

Cross References.

Time to redeem property sold upon execution, §16-66-502.

18-61-106. Recovery of lands held under tax title.

(a)

No action for the recovery of any lands or for the possession thereof against any person or persons, their heirs and assigns, who may hold such lands by virtue of a purchase thereof at a sale by the collector, or the Commissioner of State Lands, for the nonpayment of taxes, or who may have purchased the lands from the state by virtue of any act providing for the sale of lands forfeited to the state for the nonpayment of taxes, or who may hold the land under a donation deed from the state, shall be maintained, unless it appears that the plaintiff, his or her ancestors, predecessors, or grantors, was seized or possessed of the lands in question within two (2) years next before the commencement of the suit or action.

(b)

This section shall not apply to lands which have been sold to any improvement district of any kind or character for taxes due such districts, nor to any taxes due any such improvement districts, but the lien of said taxes shall continue until paid.

History.

Acts 1857, § 1, p. 80; C. & M. Dig., § 6947; Acts 1937, No. 7, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8925; Acts 1945, No. 82, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-1419.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1857, § 1, p. 80, as amended, is also codified as §18-60-212(a) and (b).

Cross References.

Recovery of lands held under tax title, §18-60-212.